Hawaii statutes.
SUBTITLE 6.
[GENERAL AND MISCELLANEOUS

PROGRAMS]

CHAPTER
193

CONSERVATION:
EMPLOYMENT PROGRAMS

Part I. Corps of Civilian Workers--Repealed

Section

193-1, 2 Repealed

Part II. Youth Conservation Corps--Repealed

193-11 to 13 Repealed

Part III. Youth Employment Program

193-21 Authorization

193-22 Administration

193-23 Personnel laws; applicability

Part IV. Hawaii Youth Conservation Corps

193-31 Authorization

193-32 Administration

193-33 Personnel laws; applicability

Note

L 2014, c 218, §8 purports to amend this chapter.

Cross References

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next